Utah statutes.
10-7-79.   Power of board of city commissioners or council to provide for
development of resources.
The boards of city commissioners or city councils of the respective cities
within the state are authorized and empowered to provide for the development
of the city's mineral, water, manpower, industrial and other resources.
